Arkansas, session 2025, SB266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 17, Subchapter 3, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-17-311. Student mentor — Definitions.
(a) A public school may adopt a policy for one (1) or more student
mentors to provide support, services, and programs for enrolled students,
staff employed by the public school, and parents of enrolled students as
assigned by the public school.
(b) A policy adopted under subsection (a) of this section shall
include the following without limitation:
(1) A description of the support, services, or programs to which
a student mentor may be assigned;
(2) A requirement that a public school superintendent or
director, as relevant, that has a student mentor or student mentors under
this section inform all parents of the availability of the support, services,
and programs provided by the student mentor or students mentors; and
(3)(A) A requirement that a public school receive parental
consent before a student participates in or receives support, services, and
programs provided by a student mentor.
*TNL180*
03-18-2025 16:11:02 TNL180

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 SB266
(B) If a public school has more than one (1) student
mentor, then a parental consent form required under subdivision (b)(3)(A) of
this section shall allow a parent to select a student mentor from a list
provided by a public school.
(c) A public school that adopts a policy under subsection (a) of this
section shall publish a list of student mentors, which may include without
limitation school chaplains, and any religious affiliation of the student
mentor, if applicable, employed by or accepted as a volunteer at the public
school under subsection (a) of this section on the website of the public
school.
(d)(1) Before a student mentor under this section is permitted access
to public school grounds when public school students are present and before
he or she has direct contact with public school students, a public school
shall pay the full cost of a:
(A) Statewide and nationwide criminal records check by the
Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police, which shall
conform to the applicable federal standards and include the taking of the
student mentor's fingerprints; and
(B) Child Maltreatment Central Registry check by the
Department of Human Services.
(2) Upon completion of the statewide and nationwide criminal
records checks and the Child Maltreatment Central Registry check, the
Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police and the
department shall forward all releasable information to the public school and
to the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(3) A public school shall not employ or accept as a volunteer a
student mentor who has registered or is required to register as a sex
offender under the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997, § 12-12-901 et seq.
(e) As used in this section:
(1) "Parent" means a parent, legal guardian, or person standing
in loco parentis to a student;
(2) "Public school" means:
(A) A school operated by a public school district; or
(B) An open-enrollment public charter school; and
(3) "School chaplain" means a member of the clergy who
volunteers or is employed by a public school who:
03-18-2025 16:11:02 TNL180

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 SB266
(A) Functions in a pluralistic environment; and
(B) Directly and indirectly supports the free exercise of
religion by all individuals in a public school.

/s/J. Dotson































03-18-2025 16:11:02 TNL180